Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0628.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 109t. (1) The department shall provide coverage under the medical assistance program for syringe service programs. (2) As used in this section, "syringe service programs" means harm reduction programs that provide a wide range of services, including, but not limited to, the provision of new, unused hypodermic needles and syringes and other injection drug use supplies, such as cookers, tourniquets, alcohol wipes, or sharps waste disposal containers, to individuals who inject drugs.